Illinois, session 104th, HB4146.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $5,000,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Build 6Illinois Bond Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic 7Opportunity for a grant to Monroe County for cost associated 8with levee construction, improvements, and repairs. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102026.